Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.030

Reentry of prior dropouts into common schools, rules—Eligibility for test to earn a high school equivalency certificate.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt, by rules, policies and procedures to permit a prior common school dropout to reenter at the grade level appropriate to such individual's ability: PROVIDED, That such individual shall be placed with the class he or she would be in had he or she not dropped out and graduate with that class, if the student's ability so permits notwithstanding any loss of credits prior to reentry and if such student earns credits at the normal rate subsequent to reentry.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any certified education center student sixteen years of age or older, upon completion of an individual student program, is eligible to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in accordance with rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.190 as given throughout the state.

[ 2013 c 39 s 6. Prior: 1993 c 218 s 2; 1993 c 211 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 182; 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.97.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 341: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.